Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LAKE SUPERIOR SCHOOL DISTRICT; SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used in and equipment incorporated into the following projects in Independent School District No. 381, Lake Superior School District, are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under applicable statutes if materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after December 31, 2022, and before January 1, 2026: new text end new text begin (1) an addition and improvements to Minnehaha Elementary School; new text end new text begin (2) an addition and improvements to William Kelly School; new text end new text begin (3) improvements to Two Harbors High School; new text end new text begin (4) improvements to or replacement of the Two Harbors Bus Garage and Silver Bay Bus Garage; and new text end new text begin (5) improvements to athletic facilities. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied, and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). Refunds for eligible purchases must not be issued until after January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2022, and before January 1, 2026. new text end